Alabama, session 2026rs, HB311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 36-22-64, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§36-22-64
(a) No individual may participate in both a
supernumerary sheriff program and the Employees' Retirement
System based on the same service.
(b) An individual who independently qualifies for a
supernumerary sheriff program and the Employees' Retirement
System based on separate years of service may participate in
both programs.
(c) If any sheriff is eligible for retirement benefits
under any other county, state, or municipal retirement plan or
act, then, in that event, he or she shall elect the plan plans
or act acts in which he or she desires to participate and
shall so notify the proper authority within not later than 60
days after he or she becomes eligible for any payments under
this article. It is further; provided, however that such
election shall not affect any such person's individual's
entitlement to benefits under the provisions of Article 4 of
Chapter 21 of this title."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
Page 1

Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
HB311 Enrolled
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB311 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 03-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 09-Apr-26 Passed



Page 3